District of Columbia statutes.
2-1511

Severability.

If any provision of this subchapter is held invalid, the remainder of this subchapter shall not be affected.

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-93, § 12, 23 DCR 9532b
1981 Ed., § 1-2611.
1973 Ed., § 6-2011.